Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 333, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 4, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 2200), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2200. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
June 1, 2026 July 1, 2036, the Oklahoma Organized Retail Crime Task
Force. The purpose of the task force shall be to provide the
Legislature and the Governor with information on organized retail
crime and the advantages and drawbacks of instituting various
countermeasures to counter losses from retail theft in the state.
B. The task force shall consist of fifteen (15) members as
follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1462 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Three members, appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall
be an individual who represents state or local law enforcement;
2. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate;
3. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives;
4. One member appointed by the District Attorneys Council;
5. One member appointed by the Oklahoma Retail Merchants
Association;
6. One member appointed by the State Chamber;
7. One member appointed by the Oklahoma Sheriffs’ Association;
8. One member appointed by the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs
of Police;
9. One member appointed by the Attorney General;
10. One member from appointed by the Convenience Distributors
of Oklahoma; and
11. One member from appointed by the Oklahoma Grocers
Association.
C. Quorum for official business of the task force shall be
eight members. A chairperson and a vice chairperson shall be
elected by a majority vote of the members of the task force.
D. Members who were serving on the task force as of December
31, 2024, shall automatically be on the Oklahoma Organized Retail
Crime Task Force. Appointed members shall, to the greatest extent
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1462 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prac ticable, have by education or experience, knowledge of organized
retail theft. The chair chairperson shall hold the first meeting of
the task force no later than ninety (90) days after June 6, 2023.
Any vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in
the same manner provided for in the initial appointment.
E. The members of the task force shall receive no compensation
but shall receive travel reimbursement for necessary travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the
State Travel Reimbursement Act. The task force shall be staffed by
the Office of the Attorney General.
F. The task force may consult with any organization, government
entity, or person in the development of its report required pursuant
to the provisions of subsection G of this section.
G. On or before December 31, 2025, the task force shall
electronically submit to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the
chairs of the House and Senate committees that oversee public
safety, a report containing, but not limited to, the following
information based on available data:
1. A review of laws and regulations on organized retail crime
used by other states, the federal government, and foreign countries
to regulate the marketplace;
2. The use of organized retail theft’s impact on state and
local tax receipts;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1462 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The need for interagency coordination of public education
and outreach and prevention programs for business owners; and
4. Legislative and regulatory recommendations, if any, to
increase transparency and security, enhance consumer protections,
prevent organized retail theft, and to address the long-term
economic impact related to the prevalence of organized retail crime.
H. The Office of the Attorney General may employ, either
directly or through memorandums of understanding or cross-
deputization agreements, persons to serve as Oklahoma Organized
Retail Crime Task Force officers whose primary responsibility shall
be to prevent, respond to, investigate, and prosecute criminal
violations related to organized retail crime.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 3, 2026 - DO PASS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1462 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)